Connecticut, session 2026, HB05577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Special act 24-13 is amended to read as follows (Effective
from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioner of Administrative Services, on behalf of the
Commissioner of Correction, shall convey to the town of Somers a
parcel of land located in the town of Somers, at a cost equal to [the fair
market value of the property, as determined by the average of the
appraisals of two independent appraisers selected by the commissioner,
plus] the administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel
of land has an area of approximately 3 acres and is described as follows:
Beginning at a point located on the westerly side of Bilton Road and at
the northeasterly corner of land now or formerly of the State of
Connecticut located at 264 Bilton Road, said point being the
northeasterly corner of the parcel described in this section; thence
running S17º45'33"W a distance of 250.00 feet along the westerly street
line of Bilton Road; thence running [S75º36'40"E] N75º36'40"W a
distance of 468.90 feet; thence running N06º25'03"W a distance of 266.98
feet; thence running S75º36'40"E a distance of [578.44] 561.03 feet along

Substitute House Bill No. 5577
the southerly line of land now or formerly of Bushnell located at 166
Bilton Road to the point and place of the beginning. The conveyance
shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) The town of Somers shall use said parcel of land for public safety
purposes. If the town of Somers:
(1) Does not use said parcel for said purposes;
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel; or
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut.
[(b)] (c) The Commissioner of Correction shall retain an easement for
purposes of a fire department staging area on said parcel of land.
[(c)] (d) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review
of the conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after
it receives a proposed agreement from the Department of [Correction]
Administrative Services. The land shall remain under the care and
control of [said department] the Commissioner of Correction until a
conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this section.
The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or instrument
necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed or instrument
shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of [subsection (b)]
subsections (b) and (c) of this section. The Commissioner of [Correction]
Administrative Services shall have the sole responsibility for all other
incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-18 2 of 2